ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Piese și accesorii pentru vehicule > Siguranța și securitatea vehiculelor > Echipament de siguranță pentru ambarcațiuni: Radiofar de avarie și EPIRB; Rachete marine de semnalizare de urgență; Plute de salvare; Colaci de salvare; Sisteme pentru om la apă; Frânghii de salvare
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires > Veiligheid en bescherming voor voertuigen > Veiligheidsuitrusting voor vaartuigen: Noodbakens en EPIRB's; Noodsignaalfakkels voor op zee; Reddingsvlotten; Reddingsboeien; Man-overboordsystemen; Werplijnen
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Deli in dodatki za vozila > Varnost in zaščita vozil > Varnostna oprema za vodna plovila: Javljalniki kraja nuje in EPIRB-ji; Pomorske signalne rakete; Rešilni splavi; Reševalni obroči; Sistemi za padec človeka v morje; Vrvi za metanje
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Deler og tilbehør til kjøretøy > Kjøretøysikkerhet > Sikkerhetsutstyr for båter: Nødpeilesendere; Marine nødbluss; Redningsflåter; Redningsbøyer; Mann over bord-systemer; Kastetau
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品 > 乗り物の安全・防犯関連用品 > 水上船舶用安全装備: 遭難信号ビーコン・EPIRB; 緊急用海洋照明弾; 救命いかだ; 救命浮輪; 落水者救助システム; ロープを投げる
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Pièces détachées pour véhicules > Sécurité des véhicules > Équipement de sécurité pour embarcations: Balises de détresse et EPIRB; Fusées d’urgence marines; Radeaux de sauvetage; Bouées de sauvetage; Systèmes de protection d’homme à la mer; Cordes à lancer
pl: Pojazdy i części > Akcesoria i części do pojazdów > Zabezpieczenia pojazdów > Sprzęt bezpieczeństwa do jednostek pływających: Radiolatarnie ratunkowe i EPIRB; Awaryjne flary morskie; Tratwy ratunkowe; Koła ratunkowe; Systemy „człowiek za burtą”; Liny ratunkowe
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvojen osat ja tarvikkeet > Ajoneuvon turvallisuus > Veneiden turvavarustus: Hätämajakat ja hätäpaikannusradiopoijut; Hätäraketit merikäyttöön; Pelastuslautat; Pelastusrenkaat; Mies yli laidan -järjestelmät; Heittoköydet
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛零件/配件 > 車輛安全 > 船艦安全裝備: 遇險信標與 EPIRBs; 海上緊急照明彈; 救生筏; 救生圈; 人員落水系統; 拋繩
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 부품/부대용품 > 차량 안전/보안 > 선박 안전 장비: 비상 비콘 및 EPIRB; 비상 해양 플레어; 구명뗏목; 구명부표; 맨 오버보드 시스템; 구명 로프
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Bộ phận và phụ kiện xe cộ > An toàn và an ninh xe cộ > Thiết bị an toàn dành cho tàu thủy: Đèn báo hiệu cấp cứu và EPIRB; Pháo sáng khẩn cấp trên biển; Bè cứu sinh; Phao cứu sinh; Hệ thống phát hiện người rơi xuống biển; Dây thừng ném
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Запчасти и аксессуары для транспортных средств > Защитная экипировка и товары для обеспечения безопасности транспортных средств > Оборудование для обеспечения безопасности судов: Аварийные радиомаяки и EPIRB; Морские сигнальные ракеты; Спасательные плоты; Спасательные круги; Системы «Человек за бортом»; Спасательные концы
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Peças e acessórios de veículos > Segurança de veículos > Equipamento de segurança para embarcações: Balizas de emergência e EPIRBs; Sinalizadores de emergência marítimos; Balsas salva-vidas; Boias salva-vidas; Sistemas de homem ao mar; Cordas de arremesso
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Acessórios e peças para veículos > Segurança e proteção para veículos > Equipamento de segurança para embarcações: Radiobalizas de emergência e EPIRBs; Sinais luminosos de emergência marítima; Balsas salva-vidas; Boias salva-vidas; Sistemas de homem ao mar; Cordas de arremesso
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járműalkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Járműbiztonság és -védelem > Vízi járművek biztonsági berendezései: Vészjelzők és EPIRB-k; Vészhelyzeti tengeri fáklyák; Mentőcsónakok; Mentőbóják; Vízbeesés-érzékelő rendszerek; Dobókötelek
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具零件/配件 > 车辆安全防盗用品 > 船舶安全装备: 遇险信标和紧急定位无线电信标; 紧急海上照明弹; 救生筏; 救生圈; 落水人员救援系统; 投掷绳索
el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ οχημάτων > Ασφάλεια & προστασία οχημάτων > Εξοπλισμός ασφάλειας σκαφών: Σήματα έκτακτης ανάγκης και EPIRBs; Θαλάσσιες φωτοβολίδες; Σωσίβιες λέμβοι; Σωσίβια; Συστήματα απομάκρυνσης ανθρώπων από σκάφος; Σχοινιά ρίψης
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Díly a příslušenství vozidel > Bezpečnost a zabezpečení vozidel > Bezpečnostní vybavení plavidel: Nouzové majáky a EPIRB; Nouzové námořní světlice; Záchranné čluny; Záchranné kruhy; Systémy „muž přes palubu“; Vrhací lana
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สำหรับยานยนต์ > ความปลอดภัยและการรักษาความปลอดภัยรถยนต์ > อุปกรณ์ความปลอดภัยสำหรับเรือ: ไฟสัญญาณขอความช่วยเหลือและ EPIRB; ไฟฉุกเฉินทางทะเล; แพชูชีพ; ห่วงชูชีพ; ระบบ Man Overboard; โยนเชือก
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Автомобилни части и аксесоари > Безопасност и сигурност на превозни средства > Оборудване за безопасност на плавателни съдове: Аварийни маяци и радиомаяци за определяне на местоположението (EPIRB); Морски сигнални ракети; Спасителни салове; Спасителни пояси; Системи за човек зад борда; Въжета за хвърляне
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicle Parts & Accessories > Vehicle Safety & Security > Watercraft Safety Equipment: Distress Beacons and EPIRBs; Emergency Marine Flares; Life Rafts; Lifebuoys; Man Overboard Systems; Throw Ropes
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Transporto priemonių sauga ir apsauga > Vandens transporto priemonių saugos įranga: Nelaimės švyturiai ir avariniai radijo plūdurai (EPIRB); Signalinės jūrų raketos; Gelbėjimo plaustai; Gelbėjimosi ratai; Sistemos „Žmogus už borto“; Metamos virvės
it: Veicoli e parti > Componenti e accessori per auto > Sicurezza e protezioni per veicoli > Attrezzatura di sicurezza per imbarcazioni: Segnalatori di pericolo ed EPIRB; Razzi di emergenza marini; Zattere di salvataggio; Salvagenti; Sistemi di salvataggio uomo in mare; Corde da lanciare
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre vozidlá > Bezpečnosť a zabezpečenie vozidla > Bezpečnostné vybavenie plavidiel: Núdzové majáky a EPIRB; Núdzové námorné svetlice; Záchranné plte; Záchranné kolesá; Systémy na záchranu ľudí cez palubu; Hádzanie lán
es: Vehículos y recambios > Piezas y accesorios para vehículos > Seguridad y protección para vehículos > Equipo de seguridad para embarcaciones: Balizas y radiobalizas de emergencia; Bengalas marinas de emergencia; Balsas salvavidas; Aros salvavidas; Sistemas de hombre al agua; Cuerdas de lanzamiento
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör > Fahrzeugsicherheit > Sicherheitsausrüstung für Wasserfahrzeuge: Notsignale und EPIRBs; Notfall-Marine-Leuchtfackeln; Rettungsinseln; Rettungsringe; Mann-über-Bord-Systeme; Wurfseile
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar > Taşıt Güvenliği ve Emniyeti > Deniz Uçağı Güvenlik Donanımı: Acil Durum Vericileri ve Acil Durum Konum Gösterici Telsiz Vericileri; Deniz İçin Acil Durum İşaret Fişekleri; Cankurtaran Salları; Cankurtaran Simitleri; Tekneden Denize Düşmeyi Önleme Sistemleri; Kurtarma Halatları
da: Køretøjer og dele > Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer > Køretøjssikkerhed > Sikkerhedsudstyr til både: Nødrotorblink og EPIRB'er; Marine nødblus; Redningsflåder; Redningsbøjer; Man overbord systemer; Kastereb
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Dijelovi i oprema za vozila > Sigurnost i zaštita vozila > Sigurnosna oprema za plovila: Predajnici radiosignala pogibli i radio plutače za otkrivanje mjesta nesreće (EPIRB); Pomorske baklje za hitne slučajeve; Splavi za spašavanje; Koluti za spašavanje; Sustavi za detektiranje čovjeka u moru; Užad za spašavanje
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordonsdelar och tillbehör > Fordonssäkerhet > Säkerhetsutrustning för vattenskotrar: Nödsändare och EPIRB; Marint nödbloss för nödsituationer; Livflottar; Livbojar; Man överbord-system; Kasta rep